Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 8 Treatment of Alcoholics and Intoxicated Persons

37-8-1 through 37-8-53.
[Reserved]

History.
Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, §§ 10, 11, effective July 1, 1994, repealed and reserved this chapter concerning the treatment of alcoholics and intoxicated persons. This chapter was based on Ga. L. 1974, p. 200, §§ 1-21; Ga. L. 1978,
p. 2048, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Code 1981, Code Section 37-8-53, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 782, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 684, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1185, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 14; Ga. L. 1987,
p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1987, p. 797, § 9; and Ga. L. 1989, p. 501, § 1, and consisted of 37-8-1 through 37-8-12 (Article 1), 37-8-30 through 37-8-36 (Article 2), 37-8-50 through 37-8-52 (Article 3), and 37-8-53 (Article 4); repealed by
Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, §§ 10 and 11, effective July 1, 1994.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, §§ 10 and 11 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 1994.